src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adj

+A: # ;
+A+N: Cases-Normal ;




LEXICON Adjectives

ариун:ариун Adj ; ! "pure"
сайхан:сайхан Adj ; ! "good"
муу:муу Adj ; ! "bad"
зөв:зөв Adj ; ! "correct"
ёстой:ёстой Adj ; ! "necessary"
хэрэгтэй:хэрэгтэй Adj ; ! "necessary"
эмэгтэй:эмэгтэй Adj ; ! "female / woman"
эрэгтэй:эрэгтэй Adj ; ! "male / man"
адил:адил Adj ; ! "same"
адилхан:адилхан Adj ; ! "similar"
шинэ:шинэ Adj ; ! "new"
том:том Adj ; ! "big"
жижиг:жиж%{а%}г Adj ; ! "small"
жижигхэн:жижигх%{а%}н Adj ; ! "little"
цагаан:цагаа%{ң%} Adj ; ! "white"   ! FIXME: check ң
улаан:улаа%{ң%} Adj ; ! "red"       ! FIXME: check ң
дулаан:дулаа%{ң%} Adj ; ! "warm"    ! FIXME: check ң
чухал:чух%{а%}л Adj ; ! "important"
амархан:амархан Adj ; ! "easy"
хэзүү:хэзүү Adj ; ! "hard"
буруу:буруу Adj ; ! "wrong, incorrect"
түгээмэл:түгээмэл Adj ; ! "general"
өндөр:өндөр Adj ; ! "high"
шигшээ:шигшээ Adj ; ! "qualifying/championship/final [game]"
дээд:дээд Adj ; ! "uppder, top"
тэргүүн:тэргүүн Adj ; ! "main, primary"
төв:төв Adj ; ! "central"
бусад:бус%{а%}д Adj ; ! "other"
үндсэн:үндс%{а%}н Adj ; ! "basic, fundamental"
эсрэг:эсрэг Adj ; ! "reverse"
алдартай:алдартай Adj ; ! "famous"


зүүн:зүүн Adj ; ! "east"
хойд:хойд Adj ; ! "north"
баруун:баруун Adj ; ! "west"
өмнө:өмнө Adj ; ! "south"
